test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - alkoholaváddu: # GOAHTI-A SgNom + GOAHTI-U 
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváddu, alkohola-váddu]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: [alkoholaváttu, alkohola-váttu, alkohola-vátto, alkoholavátto]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc: [alkoholaváttu, alkohola-váttu]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc: [alkoholaváttus, alkohola-váttus]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill: [alkoholaváddui, alkohola-váddui]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com: [alkoholaváttuin, alkohola-váttuin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom: [alkoholaváttut, alkohola-váttut]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen: [alkoholaváttuid, alkohola-váttuid]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc: [alkoholaváttuid, alkohola-váttuid]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc: [alkoholaváttuin, alkohola-váttuin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill: [alkoholaváttuide, alkohola-váttuide]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com: [alkoholaváttuiguin, alkohola-váttuiguin]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess:    [alkoholaváddun, alkohola-váddun]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttoš, alkohola-váttoš]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttožaš, alkohola-váttožaš]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttuheapme, alkoholaváttoheapme, alkohola-váttuheapme, alkohola-váttoheapme]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttolaš, alkohola-váttolaš]

  Noun - juogusgirji: # MALISLONG SgNom + GOAHTI-I
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirji, juogus-girji]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Gen: [juogusgirjji, juogus-girjji, juogus-girjje, juogusgirjje]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Acc: [juogusgirjji, juogus-girjji]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Loc: [juogusgirjjis, juogus-girjjis]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Ill: [juogusgirjái, juogus-girjái]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Com: [juogusgirjjiin, juogus-girjjiin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Nom: [juogusgirjjit, juogus-girjjit]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Gen: [juogusgirjjiid, juogus-girjjiid]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Acc: [juogusgirjjiid, juogus-girjjiid]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Loc: [juogusgirjjiin, juogus-girjjiin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Ill: [juogusgirjjiide, juogus-girjjiide]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Com: [juogusgirjjiiguin, juogus-girjjiiguin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Ess: [juogusgirjin, juogus-girjin]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjáš, juogus-girjjáš]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjážaš, juogus-girjjážaš]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjiheapme, juogusgirjjeheapme, juogus-girjjiheapme, juogus-girjjeheapme]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjálaš, juogus-girjjálaš]
    
  Noun - beroštusgeašluondu: # JOHTOLAT SgNom + MiddleNouns + LUONDU
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Nom: [beroštusgeašluondu, beroštusgeaš-luondu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Gen: [beroštusgeašluonddu, beroštusgeaš-luonddu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Acc: [beroštusgeašluonddu, beroštusgeaš-luonddu]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Loc: [beroštusgeašluonddus, beroštusgeaš-luonddus]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Ill: [beroštusgeašlundui, beroštusgeaš-lundui]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Com: [beroštusgeašluondduin, beroštusgeaš-luondduin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Nom: [beroštusgeašluonddut, beroštusgeaš-luonddut]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Gen: [beroštusgeašluondduid, beroštusgeaš-luondduid]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Acc: [beroštusgeašluondduid, beroštusgeaš-luondduid]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Loc: [beroštusgeašluondduin, beroštusgeaš-luondduin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Ill: [beroštusgeašluondduide, beroštusgeaš-luondduide]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Com: [beroštusgeašluondduiguin, beroštusgeaš-luondduiguin]
    beroštus+v1+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Ess: [beroštusgeašluondun, beroštusgeaš-luondun]


  Noun - dábálašbeaivebálká: # DABALAS SgNom + ALBMILONG 
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálká, dábálaš-beaivebálká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: [dábálašbeaivebálkká, dábálaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: [dábálašbeaivebálkká, dábálaš-beaivebálkká]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: [dábálašbeaivebálkkás, dábálaš-beaivebálkkás]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: [dábálašbeaivebálkái, dábálaš-beaivebálkái]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Com: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáin, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálkkát, dábálaš-beaivebálkkát]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Gen: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáid, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Acc: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáid, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáid]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Loc: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáin, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Ill: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáide, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáide]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Com: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáiguin, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáiguin]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: [dábálašbeaivebálkán, dábálaš-beaivebálkán]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáš, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáš]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálkkážaš, dábálaš-beaivebálkkážaš]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálkkáheapme, dábálaš-beaivebálkkáheapme]
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [dábálašbeaivebálkkálaš, dábálaš-beaivebálkkálaš]

  Noun - apmilbealjuogus: # FirstComponent + MALISLONG 
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Nom: [apmilbealjuogus, apmilbeal-juogus]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Gen: [apmilbealjuhkosa, apmilbeal-juhkosa]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Acc: [apmilbealjuhkosa, apmilbeal-juhkosa]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Loc: [apmilbealjuhkosis, apmilbeal-juhkosis]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Ill: [apmilbealjuhkosii, apmilbeal-juhkosii]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Com: [apmilbealjuhkosiin, apmilbeal-juhkosiin]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Nom: [apmilbealjuhkosat, apmilbeal-juhkosat]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Gen: [apmilbealjuhkosiid, apmilbeal-juhkosiid]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Acc: [apmilbealjuhkosiid, apmilbeal-juhkosiid]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Loc: [apmilbealjuhkosiin, apmilbeal-juhkosiin]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Ill: [apmilbealjuhkosiidda, apmilbeal-juhkosiidda]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Com: [apmilbealjuhkosiiguin, apmilbeal-juhkosiiguin]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Ess: [apmilbealjuogusin, apmilbeal-juogusin]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [apmilbealjuhkosaš, apmilbeal-juhkosaš]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [apmilbealjuhkosaččaš, apmilbeal-juhkosaččaš]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/heapmi+A+Sg+Nom: [apmilbealjuogusheapme, apmilbeal-juogusheapme]
    apmilbeal+N+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom: [apmilbealjuoguslaš, apmilbeal-juoguslaš]


  Noun - beanalihtti: # BEANA SgNom + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: [beanalihtti, beana-lihtti]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: [beanalihtis, beana-lihtis]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: [beanalihttái, beana-lihttái]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [beanalihtáš, beana-lihtáš]

  Noun - beatnatlihtti: # BEANA SgGen + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: [beatnatlihtti, beatnat-lihtti, beatnaga-lihtti, beatnagalihtti]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: [beatnatlihtis, beatnat-lihtis, beatnaga-lihtis, beatnagalihtis]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: [beatnatlihttái, beatnat-lihttái, beatnaga-lihttái, beatnagalihttái]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [beatnatlihtáš, beatnat-lihtáš, beatnaga-lihtáš, beatnagalihtáš]

  Noun - beatnagiidlihtti: # BEANA PlGenCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: [beatnagiidlihtti, beatnagiid-lihtti]
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: [beatnagiidlihtis, beatnagiid-lihtis]
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: [beatnagiid-lihttái, beatnagiidlihttái]
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [beatnagiidlihtáš, beatnagiid-lihtáš]

  Noun - duovddadilli: # SEAMU SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: [duovddadilli, duovdda-dilli]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: [duovddadili, duovdda-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [duovddadilláme, duovdda-dilláme]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: [duovddadili, duovdda-dili]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: [duovddadilis, duovdda-dilis]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: [duovddadillái, duovdda-dillái]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: [duovddadiliin, duovdda-diliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: [duovddadilit, duovdda-dilit]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: [duovddadiliid, duovdda-diliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: [duovddadiliid, duovdda-diliid]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: [duovddadiliin, duovdda-diliin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: [duovddadiliide, duovdda-diliide]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: [duovddadiliiguin, duovdda-diliiguin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: [duovddadillin, duovdda-dillin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [duovddadiláš, duovdda-diláš]
